Idaho, session 2025, H0451.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support
Program's Division of Educational Services for the Deaf and the Blind the
following amounts to be expended from the listed funds for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Public School Income Fund $492,000
School for the Deaf and the Blind Endowment Fund 12,900
TOTAL $504,900
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $492,000 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Educa-
tional Services for the Deaf and the Blind $492,000 shall be considered ex-
pended from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.
SECTION 4. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Educa-
tional Services for the Deaf and the Blind $12,900 shall be considered ex-
pended from the School for the Deaf and the Blind Endowment Fund for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.


SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.